Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1207
Performance audits; criteria.

The committee may develop criteria to be used to screen requests for performance audits. The committee shall consult with the Legislative Auditor in the application of the screening criteria.

Laws 1992, LB 988, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 607, § 10;

Laws 2006, LB 956, § 7.